src/common/backend/tsearch/dicts/hunspell_sample_long.affix
FLAG long

AF 11
AF cZ		#1
AF cL		#2
AF sGsJpUsS	#3
AF sSpB		#4
AF cZsS		#5
AF sScZs\sE	#6
AF sA		#7
AF CaCp		#8
AF CcCp		#9
AF sD		#10
AF sB		#11

COMPOUNDFLAG cZ
COMPOUNDBEGIN Ca
COMPOUNDMIDDLE Cb
COMPOUNDEND Cc
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG Cp
ONLYINCOMPOUND cL

PFX pB Y 1
PFX pB   0	re	.

PFX pU N 1
PFX pU   0	un	.

SFX sJ Y 1
SFX sJ   0	INGS	[^E]

SFX sG Y 1
SFX sG   0	ING		[^E]

SFX sS Y 1
SFX sS   0	S	[^SXZHY]

SFX sA Y 1
SFX sA   Y	IES	[^AEIOU]Y{1}

SFX sB Y 1
SFX sB   0	ED	K{1}

# Affixes with compound flags
SFX s\ N 1
SFX s\   0	Y/2	[^Y]

SFX sE N 1
SFX sE   0	S/2	[^S]

# Check duplicate affixes
SFX sD N 1
SFX sD   0	S/2	[^S]
